Maryland, session 2026, SB0086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
2–102.
[(a)] The State shall provide the members of the General Assembly with reasonable
office space and services, equipment, and secretarial services, as provided in the State
budget.
[(b) (1) A municipal corporation, county, or other political subdivision or its
governing body may not subsidize a member of the General Assembly in the maintenance
of the space, services, or equipment.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0086*

SENATE BILL 86
(2) This subsection does not prohibit the establishment of an office by a
political subdivision to maintain liaison between the subdivision and the General
Assembly.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.